Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201664-305
Course of instruction; examination.

(1) Before registering as an electronic notary public, a notary public shall take a course of instruction approved by the Secretary of State and pass an examination for such course in addition to the requirements provided in section 64-101.01.

(2) The content of the course and the basis for the examination shall include notarial laws, procedures, technology, and the ethics of electronic notarization.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 5.
July 1, 2017